Washington statutes.
RCW 18.360.005

Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds that medical assistants are health professionals specifically trained to work in settings such as physicians' offices, clinics, group practices, and other health care facilities. These multiskilled personnel are trained to perform administrative and clinical procedures under the supervision of health care providers. Physicians value this unique versatility more and more because of the skills of medical assistants and their ability to contain costs and manage human resources efficiently. The demand for medical assistants is expanding rapidly. The efficient and effective delivery of health care in Washington will be improved by recognizing the valuable contributions of medical assistants, and providing statutory support for medical assistants in Washington state. The legislature intends that individuals performing specialized functions be trained and supervised in a manner that will not pose an undue risk to patient safety. The legislature further finds that rural and small medical practices and clinics may have limited access to formally trained medical assistants. The legislature further intends that the secretary of health develop recommendations for a career ladder that includes medical assistants.

[ 2013 c 128 s 1; 2012 c 153 s 1.]

NOTES:

Implementation—2013 c 128: "The department of health may delay the implementation of the medical assistant-registered credential to the extent necessary to comply with this act." [ 2013 c 128 s 6.]

Effective date—2013 c 128: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2013." [ 2013 c 128 s 7.]

Effective date—2012 c 153 ss 1-12, 14, 16, and 18: "Sections 1 through 12, 14, 16, and 18 of this act take effect July 1, 2013." [ 2012 c 153 s 22.]

Rules—2012 c 153: "The secretary of health shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this act." [ 2012 c 153 s 21.]